California, session 20252026, SB1201.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21), known as the “Big Beautiful Bill,” “One Big Beautiful Bill Act,” which was voted on a partisan vote with all but two Republicans voting “Aye” and all Democrats voting “No,” made the largest cuts to the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) ever in history.(b) Federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21) made these cuts to help fund one of the largest tax cuts for wealthy corporations and individuals.(c) These cuts are currently being enacted during a period of significant food inflation caused in part by United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement raids on immigrant farmworkers and trade tariffs levied unilaterally by President Donald J. Trump.(d) Among these cuts include those assigned to out of work veterans, including veterans with children.(e) The cuts to veterans and their families are applied, according to federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21), even if the veteran has a pending determination of disability by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, even if the veteran and their family are homeless, even if the veteran is attempting but unable to find employment, and even if the veteran is newly discharged.(f) The Legislature declares that no one should experience hunger, especially veterans or their children.(g) The Legislature encourages all efforts to reduce the number of veterans harmed by this cruel new federal policy and seeks to ensure that no hero experiences hunger.SEC. 2. Section 18923.5 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:18923.5. (a) On or before April 1, 2027, the department shall submit a request to the United States Department of Agriculture to waive the provisions of Section 273.9(c)(1)(vii) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations to exclude the costs incurred by a veteran associated with the veteran’s job search from countable income in the determination of eligibility and benefit level for purposes of receiving CalFresh benefits. The waiver requested pursuant to this subdivision shall be implemented within six months from the approval of the waiver.(b) (1) On or before April 1, 2027, the department shall submit a request to the United States Department of Agriculture to waive applicable provisions of federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21) to exempt the following veterans from the time limit and associated work requirements:(A) Veterans discharged for less than one year.(B) Veterans with children in their home.(C) Veterans who have a pending disability claim with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.(D) Homeless veterans.(2) The waiver requested pursuant to this subdivision shall be implemented within six months from the approval of the waiver.(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Armed Forces of the United States” means the United States Air Force, Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard.(2) “Veteran” means a person who served in the Armed Forces of the United States and who was discharged or released.SEC. 3. Section 18926.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18926.6. In a county that elects to participate in the CalFresh E&T program, a veteran applying for CalFresh benefits who is required to register to work, whether or not they are exempt from mandatory placement in the CalFresh E&T program pursuant to Section 18926.5, shall be given the opportunity to participate as a volunteer in the CalFresh E&T program, program and shall be provided with a referral to the local county veterans service office and a referral to veterans’ assistance and job training agencies.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.